Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1260
Act, how cited.

Sections 72-1237 to 72-1260 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 132, p. 2432;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 74;

Laws 1996, LB 847, § 25.